Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1272.


UNLAWFUL CARRY


A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be


unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or


in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,


revolver, shotgun, or rifle, whether loaded or unloaded or any


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other



Req. No. 3154 Page 1


offensive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,


except this section shall not prohibit:


1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,


fishing, or educational or recreational purposes;


2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise


permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;


3. The carrying, possession, and use of any weapon by a peace


officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the


performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of


the employing agency;


4. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district


judge, associate district judge, or special district judge within


this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and


whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts;


5. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons provided


in this subsection when used for the purpose of living history


reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, “living history


reenactment” means depiction of historical characters, scenes,


historical life, or events for entertainment, education, or


historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,


historical, antique, or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,


weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or

Req. No. 3154 Page 2


6. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the


carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,


by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a


person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)


years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United


States Armed Forces, Reserves, or National Guard or was discharged


under honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,


Reserves, or National Guard, and the person is otherwise not


disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under


state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance


of a crime.


Except as provided in subsection B of Section 1283 of this


title, a person who has been convicted of any one of the following


offenses in this state or a violation of the equivalent law of


another state:


a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of


Section 644 of this title which caused serious


physical injury to the victim,


b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the


provisions of Section 646 of this title,


c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse


as defined in Section 644 of this title,


d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of


this title,

Req. No. 3154 Page 3


e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection


from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection


order issued by another state, or


f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession


under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act,


shall be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of


this paragraph. Any person who carries a firearm in the manner


provided for in this paragraph shall be prohibited from carrying the


firearm into any of the places prohibited in subsection A of Section


1277 of this title or any other place currently prohibited by law.


Nothing in this section shall modify or otherwise change where a


person may legally carry a firearm.


B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision


subsection A of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable as provided in Section 1276 of this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1287, as


amended by Section 59, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1287), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1287.


USE OF FIREARM WHILE COMMITTING A FELONY


A. Any person who, while committing or attempting to commit a


felony, possesses a pistol, shotgun, or rifle or any other offensive


weapon in such commission or attempt, whether the pistol, shotgun,

Req. No. 3154 Page 4


or rifle is loaded or not, or who possesses a blank or imitation


pistol, altered air or toy pistol, shotgun, or rifle capable of


raising in the mind of one threatened with such device a fear that


it is a real pistol, shotgun, or rifle, or who possesses an air gun


or carbon dioxide or other gas-filled weapon, electronic dart gun,


conductive energy weapon, knife, dagger, dirk, switchblade knife,


blackjack, ax, loaded cane, billy, hand chain, or metal knuckles, in


addition to the penalty provided by statute for the felony committed


or attempted shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony


offense for possessing such weapon or device, which shall be a


separate offense from the felony committed or attempted and shall be


punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for a period of not less than two (2) years nor for more


than ten (10) years for the first offense, and guilty of a Class B1


felony offense punishable for a period of not less than ten (10)


years nor more than thirty (30) years for any second or subsequent


offense.


B. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this


section after having been issued a handgun license pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall have the license


revoked and shall be liable for an administrative fine of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) upon a hearing and determination by the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation that the person is in


violation of the provisions of this section.

Req. No. 3154 Page 5


C. As used in this section:


1. “Altered toy pistol” shall mean any toy weapon which has


been altered from its original manufactured state to resemble a real


weapon; and


2. “Altered air pistol” shall mean any air pistol manufactured


to propel projectiles by air pressure which has been altered from


its original manufactured state.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3154 CN 1/14/2026 10:12:13 AM





























Req. No. 3154 Page 6